Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB111.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as Lloyd's Law.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adverse action." For an individual applicant or an individual enrollee, or a group of which an individual applicant or an individual enrollee is a part, if an individual applicant or an individual enrollee has filled or is being prescribed an opioid overdose reversal agent, doing any of the following:(1) Denying, canceling or refusing to renew insurance coverage for an applicant or enrollee.1234567891011121314151617 (2) Limiting the amount, extent or kind of coverage available to an applicant or enrollee.(3) Charging an applicant or enrollee a rate that is different from the rate charged to other applicants or enrollees."Applicant." A group or an individual who seeks to obtain coverage under an insurance policy from an insurer."Enrollee." A policyholder, subscriber or covered person under an insurance policy."Insurance policy." A life insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that is offered, issued or renewed by an insurer."Insurer." An entity licensed or authorized to conduct the business of life insurance that is governed under the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including Article XXIV thereof.Section 3. Prohibition on discrimination.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer may not take an adverse action on a life insurance policy against an applicant or enrollee solely based on an individual applicant's or enrollee's prior or current claim or obtainment of a prescription for an opioid overdose reversal agent.Section 4. Enforcement.A violation of this act shall constitute:(1) Unfair discrimination under section 353 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) An unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices under the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices 20250HB0111PN0089 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0111PN0089 - 3 - 123